New Mexico, session 2026, HB225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Air Quality Control Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] RESTRICTING RULES RELATING TO THE PRODUCTION AND DELIVERY FOR SALE OF ZERO-EMISSION VEHICLES.--The environmental improvement board shall not promulgate or continue in effect a rule that requires a manufacturer to produce or deliver for sale a certain percentage of zero-emission vehicles for a model year to control motor vehicle emissions." .233068.1